src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON SNAME_ODD-mal
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: SNAME_ODD_FLAG ;

!LEXICON SNAME_ODD-fem
!+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: SNAME_ODD_FLAG ;

LEXICON SNAME_ODD_FLAG @U.Cap.Obl@ SNAME_ODD ;
LEXICON SNAME_ODD ! Southern Sami names
   N_ODD_INFL ;

LEXICON SNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG ! Southern Sami names
   ERVASTI_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;

LEXICON VAARATJE-plc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:  VAARATJE_FLAG ;

LEXICON VAARATJE_FLAG @U.Cap.Obl@ VAARATJE ;
LEXICON VAARATJE !names vowel expansion in all cases
    +Sg+Nom:e       FINAL1 ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:e       RHyph  ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:e       RHyph  ;
    +Sg+Acc:e%>m    FINAL1 ;
    +Sg+Gen:e%>n    FINAL1 ;
    +Sg+Ill:%>asse  FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
    +Sg+Ine:%>isnie FINAL1 ;
    +Sg+Ela:%>istie FINAL1 ;
    +Sg+Com:%>inie  FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Nom:%>h       FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Acc:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Gen:%>i       FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Ill:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Ine:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Ela:%>ijstie          FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Com:%>igujmie FINAL1 ;
! +Ess:%>inie          FINAL1 ;
! +Attr:e FINAL1 ;

LEXICON JALKEDSEN-plc ! Names ending in stressless vowel
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: JALKEDSEN_FLAG ;

LEXICON JALKEDSEN_FLAG
 @U.Cap.Obl@ JALKEDSEN_INFL ;
LEXICON JALKEDSEN_INFL ! Names ending in stressless vowel
    +Sg+Nom:e%^DISIMPn   FINAL1    ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:e%^DISIMPn   RHyph     ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:e%^DISIMPn   RHyph     ;
    +Sg+Acc:e%>%^DISIMPm FINAL1    ;
    +Sg+Gen:e%>%^DISIMPn FINAL1    ;
    +Sg+Ill:%>asse       FINAL1    ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
    +Sg+Ine:%>isnie      FINAL1    ;
    +Sg+Ela:%>istie      FINAL1    ;
    +Sg+Com:%>inie       FINAL1    ;
!+Pl: N_ODD_PL ;
                      N_ODD_ESS ;
   +Attr:e%^DISIMPn   FINAL1    ;



LEXICON SNAME_ODD_PLUR-plc ! Southern Sami names
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:  SNAME_ODD_PLUR_INFL ;

!LEXICON SNAME_ODD_PLUR_FLAG ! Names ending in stressless vowel
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: SNAME_ODD_PLUR_INFL ;


 @U.Cap.Obl@ SNAME_ODD_PLUR_INFL ;
LEXICON SNAME_ODD_PLUR_INFL ! Southern Sami names
   +Pl:                 N_ODD_PL  ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:%>%^DISIMPi RHyph     ;
                        N_ODD_ESS ;
!+Attr:%>%^DISIMPh FINAL1 ;

LEXICON JAAVRETJEH-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:   JAAVRETJEH_FLAG ;

LEXICON JAAVRETJEH_FLAG
 @U.Cap.Obl@ JAAVRETJEH_INFL ;

LEXICON JAAVRETJEH_INFL
       +Cmp/SgGen:%>%^DISIMPe       RHyph     ;
          +Pl+Nom:%>%^DISIMPeh      FINAL1    ;
          +Pl+Acc:%>idie            FINAL1    ;
          +Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMPi       FINAL1    ;
       +Cmp/PlGen:%>%^DISIMPi       RHyph     ;
          +Pl+Ill:%>idie            FINAL1    ;
          +Pl+Ine:%>inie            FINAL1    ;
          +Pl+Ela:%>ijstie          FINAL1    ;
          +Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPigujmie FINAL1    ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPigyjmie FINAL1    ; !
                                    N_ODD_ESS ;
           !+Attr:e%>%^DISIMPh      FINAL1    ;


LEXICON RITCHIE-plc
   RITCHIE ;
   
   
!
!LEXICON RITCHIE-sur
!   RITCHIE ;

! Not in use, awaiting i-final fix:
! LEXICON RITCHIE-mal
! RITCHIE ;
!
! LEXICON RITCHIE-fem
! RITCHIE ;
!
! LEXICON RITCHIE-ani
! RITCHIE ;
!
! LEXICON RITCHIE-obj
! RITCHIE ;

! Not in use, awaiting i-final fix.
! LEXICON RITCHIE-femsur
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: RITCHIE ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: RITCHIE ;
!
! LEXICON RITCHIE-malfem
! +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: RITCHIE ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: RITCHIE ;

LEXICON RITCHIE ! Ritchie:Ritchijasse
@U.Cap.Obl@ RITCHIE_INFL ;
LEXICON RITCHIE_INFL
 +Sg+Nom:ije%^DISIMP    FINAL1    ;  ! DiphtongSimplification = gaaloe=> gallosne
 +Cmp/SgGen:ije%^DISIMP    RHyph     ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:ije%^DISIMP    RHyph     ;
 +Sg+Acc:ije%>%^DISIMPm FINAL1    ;
 +Sg+Gen:ije%>%^DISIMPn FINAL1    ;
 +Sg+Ill:ij%>asse       FINAL1    ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
 +Sg+Ine:ij%>isnie      FINAL1    ;
 +Sg+Ela:ij%>istie      FINAL1    ;
 +Sg+Com:ij%>inie       FINAL1    ;
     +Pl:ij             N_ODD_PL  ;
        :ij             N_ODD_ESS ;

!+Attr:ije%^DISIMP FINAL1 ;


!LEXICON RITCHIE_plcorg ! Ritchie:Ritchijasse
!+Sg+Nom:ije%^DISIMP           FINAL1 ;
!:ije%^DISIMP                   RHyph ;
!+Sg+Acc:ije%>%^DISIMPm         FINAL1 ;
!+Sg+Gen:ije%>%^DISIMPn         FINAL1 ;
!+Sg+Ill:ij%>asse           FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
!+Sg+Ine:ij%>isnie              FINAL1 ;
!+Sg+Ela:ij%>istie              FINAL1 ;
!+Sg+Com:ij%>inie               FINAL1 ;
!+Pl:ij N_ODD_PL ;
!:ij    N_ODD_ESS ;
!!+Attr:ije%^DISIMP_ FINAL1 ;


LEXICON PN_IE-plc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: PN_IE_FLAG ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: PN_IE_FLAG ;

LEXICON PN_IE-sur
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: PN_IE_FLAG ;

LEXICON PN_IE-mal
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: PN_IE_FLAG ;


LEXICON PN_IE-org
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org: PN_IE_FLAG ;

LEXICON PN_IE-ani
 +N+Prop+Sem/Ani: PN_IE_FLAG ;

!LEXICON PN_IE-plcorg
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: PN_IE_FLAG ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: PN_IE_FLAG ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Org: PN_IE_FLAG ;

!LEXICON PN_IE-mal
! +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: PN_IE_FLAG ;

!LEXICON PN_IE-fem
! +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: PN_IE_FLAG ;

! Even syllable Sámi names:
LEXICON PN_IE_FLAG @U.Cap.Obl@ PN_IE;
LEXICON PN_IE ! as N_IE, but with Prop tag
   +Sg:   N_IE_SG  ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:ie RHyph ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:ie RHyph ;
   +Pl:   N_IE_PL  ;
          N_IE_ESS ;
 +Attr:ie FINAL1   ;
 
LEXICON NIEMI-org
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org: PN_I_FINSK_FLAG ;

LEXICON NIEMI
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: PN_I_FINSK_FLAG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: PN_I_FINSK_FLAG ;

!Yaml-test for Propernoun
!! !!!LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!! Propernoun
!!€gt-norm: propernoun
!!€ Ahoniemi:       Ahoniemi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom 
!!€ Ahoniemin:      Ahoniemi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen
!!€ Ahoniemim:      Ahoniemi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc 
!!€ Ahoneaman:      Ahoniemi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill
!!€ Ahoniemesne:    Ahoniemi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine 
!!€ Ahoniemeste:    Ahoniemi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela 
!!€ Ahoniemine:     Ahoniemi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com 
!!€ Ahoniemine:     Ahoniemi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ess 


 
LEXICON PN_I_FINSK_FLAG @U.Cap.Obl@ PN_I_FINSK ;
LEXICON PN_I_FINSK
                    +Sg+Nom:i      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Cmp/SgGen:i%>n   RHyph  ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Cmp/SgNom:i%>n   RHyph  ;
                     +Sg+Acc:i%>m   FINAL1 ;
                     +Sg+Gen:i%>n   FINAL1 ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill:%>an             FINAL1 ; !SUB - is this possible? IllSg without Uml in -ie? 
!MLK:- Pippi->Pæppan sounds very strange. -> I think this should rather go as Lorentz -i- borrowing patterns - Fobi - fobijje --> Pippi - Pippijje. But Niemie->Neaman sounds good. Splitt this lexicon.

                    +Sg+Ill+Uml:%>%^1UMLan     FINAL1 ;
                    
                    +Sg+Ine:e%>sne FINAL1 ;
                    +Sg+Ela:e%>ste FINAL1 ;
                    +Sg+Com:%>ine  FINAL1 ;
                    +Sg+Ess:%>ine  FINAL1 ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl: N_IE_PL ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:    N_IE_ESS ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Attr:ie%>n FINAL1 ;


          

LEXICON PN_I_FINSK-sur
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: PN_I_FINSK_FLAG ;

! LEXICON PN_I_FINSK-mal
! +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: PN_I_FINSK_FLAG ;
!
! LEXICON PN_I_FINSK-fem
! +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: PN_I_FINSK_FLAG ;
!
! LEXICON PN_I_FINSK-org
! +N+Prop+Sem/Org: PN_I_FINSK_FLAG ;
