src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNoun
Aallejegaejsienjaevrie:Aalleje^gaejsien^jaevr PN_IE-plc "9 VATTDRTX" ;
Aartegenvaellie:Aartegen^vaell PN_IE-plc "21 TERRTX" ;
Aevjieaesie:Aevjie#aes PN_IE-plc "62 TERRTX" ;
Barsjenjaevrie:Barsjen^jaevr PN_IE-plc ; 
Bielnie:Bieln PN_IE-plc ; 
Bientie:Bient PN_IE-sur ; 
Bijjie% Båatsoevaaratje:Bijjie% Båatsoe^vaaratj VAARATJE-plc "21 TERRTX" ;
Bijjie% Haavhkanjaevrie:Bijjie% Haavhkan^jaevr PN_IE-plc "21 VATTTX" ;
Bissiejaevrie:Bissie^jaevr PN_IE-plc ; 
Bláhnage:Bláhnag VAARATJE-plc ; !Umesámi
Bláhnagesuvvane:Bláhnage^suvvan VAARATJE-plc ; !Umesámi
Buajtahke:Buajtahk VAARATJE-plc ; 
Buhtjemejaevrie:Buhtjeme^jaevr PN_IE-plc ; 
Bárjiege:Bárjieg VAARATJE-plc ; !Umesámi
Bäjtjandurrie:Bäjtjan^durr PN_IE-plc "9 TERRTX" ;
Båvnevaaratje:Båvne^vaaratj VAARATJE-plc "21 TERRTX" ;
Bïernenskaertie:Bïernen^skaert PN_IE-plc ; 
Diebrie:Diebr PN_IE-plc "62 TERRTX" ;
Diggiesuvvane:Diggie^suvvan VAARATJE-plc ; !Umesámi
Durrie:Durr PN_IE-plc "62 TERRTX" ;
Dåeriesbaektie:Dåeries^baekt PN_IE-plc "26 TERRTX" ;
Kroenesbaahkenjaevrie:Kroenesbaahken^jaevr PN_IE-plc ;!vannet ovenfor holmvannet/Såålejaevrie vest for Majavatn
Erie:Eri RITCHIE-plc ;
Ermehke:Ermehk SNAME_ODD-mal ;
Europaraerie:Europa#raer PN_IE-org ;
Fielhpenjuenie:Fielhpe^njuen PN_IE-plc "21 TERRTX" ;
Gaajsarjaevrie:Gaajsar^jaevr PN_IE-plc "62 VATTDRTX" ;
Gabtedurrie:Gabte^durr PN_IE-plc ; 
Gaebpie:Gaebp PN_IE-sur ;
Gahpsjaevrie:Gahps^jaevr PN_IE-plc "21 VATTTX" ;
Geabnajaevrie:Geabna^jaevr PN_IE-plc "21 VATTDRTX" ;
Geärggiesuvvane:Geärggie^suvvan VAARATJE-plc ; !Umesámi
Giedtienjuenie:Giedtie^njuen PN_IE-plc "62 TERRTX" ;
Gierkievaerie:Gierkie^vaer PN_IE-plc ; 
Goeblejaevrie:Goeble^jaevr PN_IE-plc "21 VATTTX" ;
Grovhtejaevrie:Grovhte^jaevr PN_IE-plc ; 
Guevtelesjaevrie:Guevteles^jaevr PN_IE-plc "13 VATTTX" ;
Guossasuvvane:Guossa^suvvan VAARATJE-plc ; !Umesámi 
Gállájávrrie:Gállá^jávrr PN_IE-plc ; !umesámi
Gåetbielesdurrie:Gået^bieles^durr PN_IE-plc ; 
Gïelesvaaratje:Gïeles^vaaratj VAARATJE-plc "21 TERRTX" ;
Haepkie:Haepk PN_IE-plc "25 TERRTX" ;
Herodese:Herodes SNAME_ODD-mal ;
Hutnegejaevrie:Hutnege^jaevr PN_IE-plc ; 
Jaahkenelkie:Jaahkenelk PN_IE-sur ;
Jarpeaesie:Jarpe#aes PN_IE-plc "62 TERRTX" ;
Jesus+Use/Sub:Jesus SNAME_ODD-mal ; !
Jillie% Ruffiejaevrie:Jillie% Ruffie^jaevr PN_IE-plc "21 VATTTX" ;
Joevenjuenie:Joeve^njuen PN_IE-plc "21 VATTTX" ;
Johannes+Use/Sub:Jååhannes SNAME_ODD-mal ; 
Kafar-Naahume:Kafar-Naahum SNAME_ODD-mal ;  ! her XXX
Klabpandurrie:Klabpan^durr PN_IE-plc "26 TERRTX" ;
Krampanjaevrie:Krampan^jaevr PN_IE-plc "9 VATTDRTX" ;
Krovhtejaevrie:Krovhte^jaevr PN_IE-plc "9 VATTDRTX" ;
Kruanahke:Kruanahk VAARATJE-plc "25 TERRTX" ;
Krániesuvvane:Kránie^suvvan VAARATJE-plc ; !Umesámi
Lievkiesåejjaevrie:Lievkies^åej^jaevr PN_IE-plc ; 
Luvlie% Ruffiejaevrie:Luvlie% Ruffie^jaevr PN_IE-plc "21 VATTTX" ;
Marmerejaevrie:Marmere^jaevr PN_IE-plc "21 VATTDRTX" ;
Mäskare:Mäskar VAARATJE-plc ; !Umesámi
Naestie:Naest PN_IE-ani ;
Nimmehtsgaejsie:Nimmehts^gaejs PN_IE-plc ; 
Njueniesvaerie:Njuenies^vaer PN_IE-plc ; 
Ohjesnjurhtjie:Ohje^snjurhtj PN_IE-plc ; 
Ohtje% Gaajsare:Ohtje% Gaajsar VAARATJE-plc "62 TERRTX" ;
Ohtje% Rijhkarjaavratje:Ohtje% Rijhkar^jaavratj VAARATJE-plc "21 VATTDRTX" ;
Ohtje% Rijhkarjaavratje:Ohtje% Rijhkar^jaavratj VAARATJE-plc "21 VATTTX" ;
Petrus+Use/Sub:Peetros SNAME_ODD-mal ; 
Petrus+Use/Sub:Petrus SNAME_ODD-mal ; !
Pilatuse:Pilatus SNAME_ODD-mal ;
Provreseåelkie:Provrese^åelk PN_IE-plc "21 VATTDRTX" ;!Brurskanken i Grane 
Raajahke:Raajahk VAARATJE-plc "21 TERRTX" ;
Raavtejaevrie:Raavte^jaevr PN_IE-plc "26 VATTTX" ;
Rijhkarjaevrie:Rijhkar^jaevr PN_IE-plc "21 VATTTX" ;
Rijhkesiebrie:Rijhke^siebr PN_IE-org ;
Råavajaevrie:Råava^jaevr PN_IE-plc "21 VATTDRTX" ;
Saemiedigkie:Saemie^digk PN_IE-org ;
Samuele:Samuel SNAME_ODD-mal ; 
Samuel+Use/Sub:Samul SNAME_ODD-mal ; 
Sealmanjaevrie:Sealman^jaevr PN_IE-plc ; 
Sebedeus+Use/Sub:Seebedevus SNAME_ODD-mal ; ! 
Siejtage:Siejtag VAARATJE-plc "21 VATTDRTX" ;
Simon+Use/Sub:Sijmon SNAME_ODD-mal ; !
Sipmesjaevrie:Sipmes^jaevr PN_IE-plc "13 VATTDRTX" ;
Sjvyjhkelenjaevrie:Sjvyjhkelen^jaevr PN_IE-plc "9 VATTDRTX" ;
Skåvrare:Skåvrar VAARATJE-plc "21 VATTDRTX" ;
Skåvrare:Skåvrar VAARATJE-plc "21 VATTTX" ;
Slätnatjaerhvie:Slätna^tjaerhv PN_IE-plc "9 TERRTX" ;
Sovjeten-ektiedimmie:Sovjeten-ektiedimm PN_IE-org ;
Stoere% Gåeblie:Stoere% Gåebl PN_IE-plc "13 VATTDRTX" ;
Stoerredigkie:Stoerre^digk PN_IE-org ;
Suejnietjaerhvie:Suejnie^tjaerhv PN_IE-plc "21 TERRTX" ;
Syöldate:Syöldat VAARATJE-plc ; !Umesámi
Tjaaktsaesie:Tjaakts^aes PN_IE-plc "62 TERRTX" ;
Tjaerhvieåajvatje:Tjaerhvie^åajvatj VAARATJE-plc ; 
Tjoelejaevrie:Tjoele^jaevr PN_IE-plc "13 VATTTX" ;
Tsåakajaevrie:Tsåaka^jaevr PN_IE-plc "13 VATTDRTX" ;
Veelnjesjaevrie:Veelnjes^jaevr PN_IE-plc ; 
Viestervielie:Viester^viel PN_IE-sur ; 
Vuelie% Båatsoevaaratje:Vuelie% Båatsoe^vaaratj VAARATJE-plc "21 TERRTX" ;
Vuelie% Fäskoenjaevrie:Vuelie% Fäskoen^jaevr PN_IE-plc "62 VATTDRTX" ;
Vyöddale:Vyöddal VAARATJE-plc ; !Umesámi
Åakerebahkedurrie:Åakere^bahke^durr PN_IE-plc ; 
